Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202675-392
Terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 75-392 to 75-3,100:

(1) Director means the Director of Motor Vehicles;

(2) Division means the Division of Motor Carrier Services of the Department of Motor Vehicles; and

(3) Unified carrier registration plan and agreement means the plan and agreement established and authorized pursuant to 49 U.S.C. 14504a, as such section existed on January 1, 2026.

Laws 2007, LB358, § 1;

Laws 2014, LB776, § 7;

Laws 2016, LB929, § 14;

Laws 2017, LB263, § 92;

Laws 2018, LB909, § 125;

Laws 2019, LB79, § 25;

Laws 2020, LB944, § 83;

Laws 2021, LB149, § 24;

Laws 2022, LB750, § 83;

Laws 2023, LB138, § 55;

Laws 2024, LB1200, § 64;

Laws 2025, LB398, § 62;

Laws 2026, LB781, § 11.
April 15, 2026